2018-komp-ling/practicals/hfst/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ
 
 %{э%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{с%}:0 %{а%}:0
 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
 %{м%}:0 %{м%}:м
 %{N%}:р %{N%}:т ;

Sets

Vow = ӑ а ы е о у я ё ю ӗ э и ӳ ;

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%} %{а%} ;

FrontVow = ӗ е э и ӳ %{э%} ;

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ;

NumCns = н л р;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: | %{л%}: | %- | %{N%}: ]+ _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                   %{м%}: %>:  _ н ;
								     Vow: %>:  _ н ;
								   
"Non surface {Ă} in plural genitive"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [ Vow: | %{м%}: ] %>: _ н ;

"Non surface {м} if following %{Ă%}: followed by н"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ;

"Consonant agreement {N} for ablative"
%{N%}:т <=> [ NumCns | %{л%}: ] [ BackVow: | FrontVow: | %- ]* _ ;
